WebApplication17/ckDil/server/dictionaries/tr.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2911 N 1
SFX 2911 0 madığından .
SFX 2912 N 1
SFX 2912 0 ınızın .
SFX 2913 N 1
SFX 2913 0 lanmadan .
SFX 2914 N 1
SFX 2914 0 nmadığından .
SFX 2915 N 1
SFX 2915 0 leştirmiştir .
SFX 2916 N 1
SFX 2916 0 yamayacağı .
SFX 2917 N 1
SFX 2917 0 acağız .
SFX 2918 N 1
SFX 2918 0 malarıydı .
SFX 2919 N 1
SFX 2919 0 ırsın .
SFX 2920 N 1
SFX 2920 0 landırılmış .
SFX 2921 N 1
SFX 2921 0 süz .
SFX 2922 N 1
SFX 2922 0 mazsın .
SFX 2923 N 1
SFX 2923 0 dıklarından .
SFX 2924 N 1
SFX 2924 0 tiyor .
SFX 2925 N 1
SFX 2925 0 lisinin .
SFX 2926 N 1
SFX 2926 0 acağın .
SFX 2927 N 1
SFX 2927 0 ılamaması .
SFX 2928 N 1
SFX 2928 0 acağım .
SFX 2929 N 1
SFX 2929 0 mesinde .
SFX 2930 N 1
SFX 2930 0 lenmeli .
SFX 2931 N 1
SFX 2931 0 lisiniz .
SFX 2932 N 1
SFX 2932 0 dınız .
SFX 2933 N 1
SFX 2933 0 mazlardı .
SFX 2934 N 1
SFX 2934 0 ilemediğine .
SFX 2935 N 1
SFX 2935 0 larımızla .
SFX 2936 N 1
SFX 2936 0 leşmelerinde .
SFX 2937 N 1
SFX 2937 0 ilemediğini .
SFX 2938 N 1
SFX 2938 0 melerinden .
SFX 2939 N 1
SFX 2939 0 lanmamalı .
SFX 2940 N 1
SFX 2940 0 mişlerdi .
SFX 2941 N 1
SFX 2941 0 macılığı .
SFX 2942 N 1
SFX 2942 0 yamadığı .
SFX 2943 N 1
SFX 2943 0 latacaklarını .
SFX 2944 N 1
SFX 2944 0 laştığımız .
SFX 2945 N 1
SFX 2945 0 nince .
SFX 2946 N 1
SFX 2946 0 şmalar .
SFX 2947 N 1
SFX 2947 0 sızlığın .
SFX 2948 N 1
SFX 2948 0 lerle .
SFX 2949 N 1
SFX 2949 0 lerimin .
SFX 2950 N 1
SFX 2950 0 laşamadıklarını .
SFX 2951 N 1
SFX 2951 0 lamayacaklarını .
SFX 2952 N 1
SFX 2952 0 ttiğinde .
SFX 2953 N 1
SFX 2953 0 lerimiz .
SFX 2954 N 1
SFX 2954 0 lısı .
SFX 2955 N 1
SFX 2955 0 lenmeyecek .
SFX 2956 N 1
SFX 2956 0 lamalardan .
SFX 2957 N 1
SFX 2957 0 sindeki .
SFX 2958 N 1
SFX 2958 0 lanışı .
SFX 2959 N 1
SFX 2959 0 liyorlar .
SFX 2960 N 1
SFX 2960 0 mişsiniz .
SFX 2961 N 1
SFX 2961 0 tmadıkları .
SFX 2962 N 1
SFX 2962 0 mayabilir .
SFX 2963 N 1
SFX 2963 0 lenmemeli .
SFX 2964 N 1
SFX 2964 0 tacakları .
SFX 2965 N 1
SFX 2965 0 laşıyor .
SFX 2966 N 1
SFX 2966 0 mızdır .
SFX 2967 N 1
SFX 2967 0 leşmek .
SFX 2968 N 1
SFX 2968 0 tmamaları .
SFX 2969 N 1
SFX 2969 0 sundaki .
SFX 2970 N 1
SFX 2970 0 muşum .
SFX 2971 N 1
SFX 2971 0 laştığından .
SFX 2972 N 1
SFX 2972 0 lıya .
SFX 2973 N 1
SFX 2973 0 larındadır .
SFX 2974 N 1
SFX 2974 0 çılığı .
SFX 2975 N 1
SFX 2975 0 cılıktan .
SFX 2976 N 1
SFX 2976 0 yebildiği .
SFX 2977 N 1
SFX 2977 0 muşuz .
SFX 2978 N 1
SFX 2978 0 leşmez .
SFX 2979 N 1
SFX 2979 0 ilmelerine .
SFX 2980 N 1
SFX 2980 0 leşmiştir .
SFX 2981 N 1
SFX 2981 0 layabilen .
SFX 2982 N 1
SFX 2982 0 ilmelerini .
SFX 2983 N 1
SFX 2983 0 layamaz .
SFX 2984 N 1
SFX 2984 0 lamalı .
SFX 2985 N 1
SFX 2985 0 memişlerdi .
SFX 2986 N 1
SFX 2986 0 ildiği .
SFX 2987 N 1
SFX 2987 0 emediğinde .
SFX 2988 N 1
SFX 2988 0 ıklarından .
SFX 2989 N 1
SFX 2989 0 lamıştı .
SFX 2990 N 1
SFX 2990 0 luğunun .
SFX 2991 N 1
SFX 2991 0 ümüzün .
SFX 2992 N 1
SFX 2992 0 tuğu .
SFX 2993 N 1
SFX 2993 0 lenmiştir .
SFX 2994 N 1
SFX 2994 0 luğunuz .
SFX 2995 N 1
SFX 2995 0 leriz .
SFX 2996 N 1
SFX 2996 0 ndiklerine .
SFX 2997 N 1
SFX 2997 0 laşırlar .
SFX 2998 N 1
SFX 2998 0 nabileceğinin .
SFX 2999 N 1
SFX 2999 0 meyeceklerini .
SFX 3000 N 1
SFX 3000 0 mışların .
SFX 3001 N 1
SFX 3001 0 mayışını .
SFX 3002 N 1
SFX 3002 0 nuz .
SFX 3003 N 1
SFX 3003 0 dirdiği .
SFX 3004 N 1
SFX 3004 0 liydiler .
SFX 3005 N 1
SFX 3005 0 iyordu .
SFX 3006 N 1
SFX 3006 0 manı .
SFX 3007 N 1
SFX 3007 0 lenemeyeceği .
SFX 3008 N 1
SFX 3008 0 lendireceği .
SFX 3009 N 1
SFX 3009 0 lılıklarını .
SFX 3010 N 1
SFX 3010 0 undadır .
SFX 3011 N 1
SFX 3011 0 yamaz .
SFX 3012 N 1
SFX 3012 0 lamadan .
SFX 3013 N 1
SFX 3013 0 nun .
SFX 3014 N 1
SFX 3014 0 celer .
SFX 3015 N 1
SFX 3015 0 sıysa .
SFX 3016 N 1
SFX 3016 0 ılan .
SFX 3017 N 1
SFX 3017 0 cısından .
SFX 3018 N 1
SFX 3018 0 madınız .
SFX 3019 N 1
SFX 3019 0 ılar .
SFX 3020 N 1
SFX 3020 0 mesindeki .
SFX 3021 N 1
SFX 3021 0 yamam .
SFX 3022 N 1
SFX 3022 0 ladıkça .
SFX 3023 N 1
SFX 3023 0 tmama .
SFX 3024 N 1
SFX 3024 0 meyeceklerine .
SFX 3025 N 1
SFX 3025 0 likleriyle .
SFX 3026 N 1
SFX 3026 0 tildiğine .
SFX 3027 N 1
SFX 3027 0 çiliğin .
SFX 3028 N 1
SFX 3028 0 tirildiği .
SFX 3029 N 1
SFX 3029 0 suyla .
SFX 3030 N 1
SFX 3030 0 lendik .
SFX 3031 N 1
SFX 3031 0 lendim .
SFX 3032 N 1
SFX 3032 0 tmış .
SFX 3033 N 1
SFX 3033 0 ılırsa .
SFX 3034 N 1
SFX 3034 0 sinler .
SFX 3035 N 1
SFX 3035 0 mayacaklarının .
SFX 3036 N 1
SFX 3036 0 cıydı .
SFX 3037 N 1
SFX 3037 0 lanmaması .
SFX 3038 N 1
SFX 3038 0 iciler .
SFX 3039 N 1
SFX 3039 0 liklerimizi .
SFX 3040 N 1
SFX 3040 0 ılıyordu .
SFX 3041 N 1
SFX 3041 0 mazsa .
SFX 3042 N 1
SFX 3042 0 mezken .
SFX 3043 N 1
SFX 3043 0 ıcıların .
SFX 3044 N 1
SFX 3044 0 ndiklerini .
SFX 3045 N 1
SFX 3045 0 mememiz .
SFX 3046 N 1
SFX 3046 0 mamaları .
SFX 3047 N 1
SFX 3047 0 larmış .
SFX 3048 N 1
SFX 3048 0 dırıldığı .
SFX 3049 N 1
SFX 3049 0 lanabildiği .
SFX 3050 N 1
SFX 3050 0 iniz .
SFX 3051 N 1
SFX 3051 0 lenmeyeceği .
SFX 3052 N 1
SFX 3052 0 inin .
SFX 3053 N 1
SFX 3053 0 lardık .
SFX 3054 N 1
SFX 3054 0 lardım .
SFX 3055 N 1
SFX 3055 0 lığınıza .
SFX 3056 N 1
SFX 3056 0 nse .
SFX 3057 N 1
SFX 3057 0 sızdır .
SFX 3058 N 1
SFX 3058 0 namadıklarını .
SFX 3059 N 1
SFX 3059 0 lenmişler .
SFX 3060 N 1
SFX 3060 0 layabilir .
SFX 3061 N 1
SFX 3061 0 lardır .
SFX 3062 N 1
SFX 3062 0 ması .
SFX 3063 N 1
SFX 3063 0 cıyla .
SFX 3064 N 1
SFX 3064 0 dırılacağını .
SFX 3065 N 1
SFX 3065 0 nsa .
SFX 3066 N 1
SFX 3066 0 yabilirdi .
SFX 3067 N 1
SFX 3067 0 sünde .
SFX 3068 N 1
SFX 3068 0 lerindeydi .
SFX 3069 N 1
SFX 3069 0 uşun .
SFX 3070 N 1
SFX 3070 0 maktadır .
SFX 3071 N 1
SFX 3071 0 ülemeyecek .
SFX 3072 N 1
SFX 3072 0 lenmemesi .
SFX 3073 N 1
SFX 3073 0 sızlıkları .
SFX 3074 N 1
SFX 3074 0 ilmemiş .
SFX 3075 N 1
SFX 3075 0 ılmadıklarını .
SFX 3076 N 1
SFX 3076 0 leştirilmesini .
SFX 3077 N 1
SFX 3077 0 ninki .
SFX 3078 N 1
SFX 3078 0 tirecek .
SFX 3079 N 1
SFX 3079 0 mize .
SFX 3080 N 1
SFX 3080 0 lerimde .
SFX 3081 N 1
SFX 3081 0 mizi .
SFX 3082 N 1
SFX 3082 0 yacağını .
SFX 3083 N 1
SFX 3083 0 muştu .
SFX 3084 N 1
SFX 3084 0 ilemeyeceği .
SFX 3085 N 1
SFX 3085 0 malarını .
SFX 3086 N 1
SFX 3086 0 madır .
SFX 3087 N 1
SFX 3087 0 lansın .
SFX 3088 N 1
SFX 3088 0 lamama .
SFX 3089 N 1
SFX 3089 0 inle .
SFX 3090 N 1
SFX 3090 0 ılmışlardı .
SFX 3091 N 1
SFX 3091 0 lasın .
SFX 3092 N 1
SFX 3092 0 iciliğine .
SFX 3093 N 1
SFX 3093 0 ıyorlarsa .
SFX 3094 N 1
SFX 3094 0 abilecek .
SFX 3095 N 1
SFX 3095 0 namadığından .
SFX 3096 N 1
SFX 3096 0 leyecekleri .
SFX 3097 N 1
SFX 3097 0 lıymış .
SFX 3098 N 1
SFX 3098 0 maya .
SFX 3099 N 1
SFX 3099 0 emediğinin .
SFX 3100 N 1
SFX 3100 0 maktır .
SFX 3101 N 1
SFX 3101 0 likle .
SFX 3102 N 1
SFX 3102 0 leştirilmesine .
SFX 3103 N 1
SFX 3103 0 tacak .
SFX 3104 N 1
SFX 3104 0 emediğiniz .
SFX 3105 N 1
SFX 3105 0 niş .
SFX 3106 N 1
SFX 3106 0 ımsın .
SFX 3107 N 1
SFX 3107 0 lemesin .
SFX 3108 N 1
SFX 3108 0 nmalı .
SFX 3109 N 1
SFX 3109 0 madık .
SFX 3110 N 1
SFX 3110 0 tildiğini .
SFX 3111 N 1
SFX 3111 0 iciliğini .
SFX 3112 N 1
SFX 3112 0 lıyı .
SFX 3113 N 1
SFX 3113 0 memeliyiz .
SFX 3114 N 1
SFX 3114 0 madım .
SFX 3115 N 1
SFX 3115 0 madın .
SFX 3116 N 1
SFX 3116 0 leşemediği .
SFX 3117 N 1
SFX 3117 0 inki .
SFX 3118 N 1
SFX 3118 0 leştirilmiştir .
SFX 3119 N 1
SFX 3119 0 leneceğini .
SFX 3120 N 1
SFX 3120 0 ılabileceğinden .
SFX 3121 N 1
SFX 3121 0 leneceğine .
SFX 3122 N 1
SFX 3122 0 meyeceğinin .
SFX 3123 N 1
SFX 3123 0 lerindeyken .
SFX 3124 N 1
SFX 3124 0 likse .
SFX 3125 N 1
SFX 3125 0 lanacaktır .
SFX 3126 N 1
SFX 3126 0 leştirmeleri .
SFX 3127 N 1
SFX 3127 0 ladığımı .
SFX 3128 N 1
SFX 3128 0 'ydı .
SFX 3129 N 1
SFX 3129 0 likte .
SFX 3130 N 1
SFX 3130 0 menizi .
SFX 3131 N 1
SFX 3131 0 lerdi .
SFX 3132 N 1
SFX 3132 0 uyoruz .
SFX 3133 N 1
SFX 3133 0 leneceği .
SFX 3134 N 1
SFX 3134 0 lerde .
SFX 3135 N 1
SFX 3135 0 eli .
SFX 3136 N 1
SFX 3136 0 ılmayacaktır .
SFX 3137 N 1
SFX 3137 0 laşmalarının .
SFX 3138 N 1
SFX 3138 0 tacaktır .
SFX 3139 N 1
SFX 3139 0 ilebileceğini .
SFX 3140 N 1
SFX 3140 0 müşler .
SFX 3141 N 1
SFX 3141 0 lıyormuş .
SFX 3142 N 1
SFX 3142 0 indeydiler .
SFX 3143 N 1
SFX 3143 0 mana .
SFX 3144 N 1
SFX 3144 0 ilebileceğine .
SFX 3145 N 1
SFX 3145 0 çılık .
SFX 3146 N 1
SFX 3146 0 direcektir .
SFX 3147 N 1
SFX 3147 0 larındaydım .
SFX 3148 N 1
SFX 3148 0 leniyor .
SFX 3149 N 1
SFX 3149 0 ulmamış .
SFX 3150 N 1
SFX 3150 0 yamadığında .
SFX 3151 N 1
SFX 3151 0 uyorum .
SFX 3152 N 1
SFX 3152 0 leşmektedir .
SFX 3153 N 1
SFX 3153 0 ışlarında .
SFX 3154 N 1
SFX 3154 0 lamadı .
SFX 3155 N 1
SFX 3155 0 larken .
SFX 3156 N 1
SFX 3156 0 eceksiniz .
SFX 3157 N 1
SFX 3157 0 leşmişler .
SFX 3158 N 1
SFX 3158 0 işiyle .
SFX 3159 N 1
SFX 3159 0 eme .
SFX 3160 N 1
SFX 3160 0 ladığını .
SFX 3161 N 1
SFX 3161 0 lanmasıyla .
SFX 3162 N 1
SFX 3162 0 lamayacak .
SFX 3163 N 1
SFX 3163 0 mama .
SFX 3164 N 1
SFX 3164 0 leştirilmemiş .
SFX 3165 N 1
SFX 3165 0 dırmadığı .
SFX 3166 N 1
SFX 3166 0 laştırmalı .
SFX 3167 N 1
SFX 3167 0 ıldı .
SFX 3168 N 1
SFX 3168 0 diremediğini .
SFX 3169 N 1
SFX 3169 0 abiliyordu .
SFX 3170 N 1
SFX 3170 0 macılar .
SFX 3171 N 1
SFX 3171 0 tamadığından .
SFX 3172 N 1
SFX 3172 0 lenmeye .
SFX 3173 N 1
SFX 3173 0 ene .
SFX 3174 N 1
SFX 3174 0 lenmeyi .
SFX 3177 N 1
SFX 3177 0 ındakiler .
SFX 3176 N 1
SFX 3176 0 çilerinden .
SFX 3175 N 1
SFX 3175 0 yışının .
SFX 3178 N 1
SFX 3178 0 lediğimiz .
SFX 3180 N 1
SFX 3180 0 nme .
SFX 3179 N 1
SFX 3179 0 layamadık .
SFX 3181 N 1
SFX 3181 0 sızlığı .
SFX 3182 N 1
SFX 3182 0 uyorsa .
SFX 3184 N 1
SFX 3184 0 nma .
SFX 3183 N 1
SFX 3183 0 lanacaklarını .
SFX 3185 N 1
SFX 3185 0 eni .
SFX 3186 N 1
SFX 3186 0 lılık .
SFX 3187 N 1
SFX 3187 0 menize .
SFX 3188 N 1
SFX 3188 0 yamadıklarından .
SFX 3190 N 1
SFX 3190 0 lemelerine .
SFX 3189 N 1
SFX 3189 0 mamalıydı .
SFX 3191 N 1
SFX 3191 0 amayacak .
SFX 3192 N 1
SFX 3192 0 lemelerini .
SFX 3193 N 1
SFX 3193 0 amazsanız .
SFX 3195 N 1
SFX 3195 0 emeyip .
SFX 3194 N 1
SFX 3194 0 amayacaktı .
SFX 3198 N 1
SFX 3198 0 lerce .
SFX 3197 N 1
SFX 3197 0 emeyiz .
SFX 3196 N 1
SFX 3196 0 lananın .
SFX 3199 N 1
SFX 3199 0 lüklerini .
SFX 3203 N 1
SFX 3203 0 memek .
SFX 3202 N 1
SFX 3202 0 nmayı .
SFX 3201 N 1
SFX 3201 0 lanabilir .
SFX 3200 N 1
SFX 3200 0 yamayınca .
SFX 3204 N 1
SFX 3204 0 lüklerine .
SFX 3205 N 1
SFX 3205 0 ilemediğinden .
SFX 3206 N 1
SFX 3206 0 nmadığında .
SFX 3208 N 1
SFX 3208 0 masa .
SFX 3207 N 1
SFX 3207 0 lerindeyiz .
SFX 3209 N 1
SFX 3209 0 nması .
SFX 3211 N 1
SFX 3211 0 nla .
SFX 3210 N 1
SFX 3210 0 mışsınızdır .
SFX 3212 N 1
SFX 3212 0 lemelerin .
SFX 3214 N 1
SFX 3214 0 memiz .
SFX 3213 N 1
SFX 3213 0 nle .
SFX 3215 N 1
SFX 3215 0 çilerinin .
SFX 3216 N 1
SFX 3216 0 leştirmenin .
SFX 3218 N 1
SFX 3218 0 tığı .
SFX 3217 N 1
SFX 3217 0 sındayız .
SFX 3219 N 1
SFX 3219 0 mamı .
SFX 3220 N 1
SFX 3220 0 mışlardır .
SFX 3222 N 1
SFX 3222 0 yeceğim .
SFX 3221 N 1
SFX 3221 0 ılırdı .
SFX 3224 N 1
SFX 3224 0 lıklarımızı .
SFX 3223 N 1
SFX 3223 0 lidirler .
SFX 3225 N 1
SFX 3225 0 nmaya .
SFX 3226 N 1
SFX 3226 0 mezsiniz .
SFX 3227 N 1
SFX 3227 0 sizleri .
SFX 3228 N 1
SFX 3228 0 umuzun .
SFX 3229 N 1
SFX 3229 0 leşerek .
SFX 3230 N 1
SFX 3230 0 çiliğinin .
SFX 3231 N 1
SFX 3231 0 yeceğiz .
SFX 3232 N 1
SFX 3232 0 sına .
SFX 3235 N 1
SFX 3235 0 lerin .
SFX 3234 N 1
SFX 3234 0 yacaklar .
SFX 3233 N 1
SFX 3233 0 tmalı .
SFX 3236 N 1
SFX 3236 0 lerim .
SFX 3238 N 1
SFX 3238 0 mayacaktır .
SFX 3237 N 1
SFX 3237 0 leştirdiğinden .
SFX 3240 N 1
SFX 3240 0 anlarından .
SFX 3239 N 1
SFX 3239 0 ttik .
SFX 3241 N 1
SFX 3241 0 malı .
SFX 3242 N 1
SFX 3242 0 dirdiğine .
SFX 3243 N 1
SFX 3243 0 masıdır .
SFX 3244 N 1
SFX 3244 0 nacaktır .
SFX 3246 N 1
SFX 3246 0 dirdiğini .
SFX 3245 N 1
SFX 3245 0 mezdim .
SFX 3249 N 1
SFX 3249 0 mezdik .
SFX 3248 N 1
SFX 3248 0 icileri .
SFX 3247 N 1
SFX 3247 0 indi .
SFX 3250 N 1
SFX 3250 0 enlerden .
SFX 3253 N 1
SFX 3253 0 inde .
SFX 3252 N 1
SFX 3252 0 likteki .
SFX 3251 N 1
SFX 3251 0 ninse .
SFX 3255 N 1
SFX 3255 0 lıdır .
SFX 3254 N 1
SFX 3254 0 leyecekler .
